Florida, session 2026, SB544.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 15 16 Section 1.âSection 403.9339, Florida Statutes, is 17 transferred, renumbered as section 604.75, Florida Statutes, and 18 amended to read: 19 604.75 403.9339âGolf course best management practices 20 certification.â 21 (1)âSHORT TITLE.âThis section shall be known and may be 22 cited as the âGolf Course Best Management Practices 23 Certification Act.â 24 (2)âLEGISLATIVE FINDINGS AND INTENT.âThe Legislature finds 25 that, due to the foundational agricultural nature of golf 26 courses and since the Department of Agriculture and Consumer 27 Services oversees best management practices programs for sod 28 growing operations and for the green industry, it is appropriate 29 for the department to oversee golf course best management 30 practices certification. Certified participants must abide by 31 the best management practices governing the application of 32 fertilizer on sod. 33 (3)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term 34 âdepartmentâ means the Department of Agriculture and Consumer 35 Services. 36 (4)(1)âTo provide a means of documenting and ensuring 37 compliance with best management practices for fertilizer 38 application to golf courses, the turfgrass science program at 39 the University of Florida Institute of Food and Agricultural 40 Sciences, in coordination with the department, shall administer 41 a certification for golf course best management practices. 42 (5)(2)âThe turfgrass science program, in cooperation with 43 the department, shall: 44 (a)âProvide training and testing programs in golf course 45 best management practices and may issue certificates 46 demonstrating satisfactory completion of the training. 47 (b)âApprove training and testing programs in golf course 48 best management practices that are equivalent to or more 49 comprehensive than the programs provided by the turfgrass 50 science program under this subsection paragraph (a). Such 51 programs must be reviewed and reapproved by the turfgrass 52 science program if significant changes are made. 53 (6)(3)âTo obtain a golf course best management practices 54 certification, an applicant must submit to the turfgrass science 55 program a copy of the training certificate issued under 56 subsection (5) subsection (2). 57 (7)(4)âA golf course best management practices 58 certification issued under this section expires 4 years after 59 the date of issuance. Upon expiration of the certification, or 60 after a grace period of not more than 30 days after the 61 expiration date, a recertification may be issued. 62 (8)(5)âTo obtain a golf course best management practices 63 recertification, an applicant must submit to the turfgrass 64 science program proof of having completed 8 classroom hours of 65 continuing education, of which at least 2 hours must address 66 fertilizer best management practices. 67 (9)(6)âA person certified under this section is exempt 68 from: 69 (a)âAdditional local training. 70 (b)âLocal ordinances relating to water and fertilizer use 71 blackout periods or restrictions, unless a state of emergency is 72 declared. The certified person must continue to coordinate with 73 the local government to ensure that he or she adheres to the 74 comprehensive best management practices for that specific 75 community. 76 (10)(7)âThis section does not exempt a person certified 77 under this section from complying with the rules and 78 requirements for basin management action plans set forth in s. 79 403.067(7) if the golf course is located in an area within a 80 basin management action plan. 81 (11)(a)(8)(a)âThe turfgrass science program may provide the 82 certification status of persons certified under this section to 83 local and state governmental entities. 84 (b)âThe turfgrass science program is encouraged to create a 85 registry of persons certified under this section on its website. 86 Section 2.âType two transfer from the Department of 87 Environmental Protection.â 88 (1)âAll powers, duties, functions, records, offices, 89 personnel, associated administrative support positions, 90 property, pending issues, existing contracts, administrative 91 authority, administrative rules, and unexpended balances of 92 appropriations, allocations, and other funds relating to the 93 Golf Course Best Management Practices Certification program 94 within the Department of Environmental Protection are 95 transferred by a type two transfer, as defined in s. 20.06(2), 96 Florida Statutes, to the Department of Agriculture and Consumer 97 Services. 98 (2)âAny binding contract or interagency agreement existing 99 before July 1, 2026, between the Department of Environmental 100 Protection, or an entity or agent of the department, and any 101 other agency, entity, or person relating to the Golf Course Best 102 Management Practices Certification program shall continue as a 103 binding contract or agreement for the remainder of the term of 104 such contract or agreement on the successor entity responsible 105 for the program, activity, or functions relative to the contract 106 or agreement. 107 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.